District of Columbia statutes.
2-302.08

Creation and duties of Office of the Inspector General.

Recodified as § 1-301.115a.

History

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 208, 32 DCR 7396
Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-201, § 5, 36 DCR 248
Apr. 17, 1995, 109 Stat. 148-151, Pub. L. 104-8, § 303(a)-(d)
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 5, 44 DCR 1271
Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 777, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11601(b)(3)
Oct. 21, 1998, 112 Stat. 2681-148, Pub. L. 105-277, § 160
Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-190,§ 2, 45 DCR 7814
April 5, 2000, D.C. Law 13-71, § 2, 46 DCR 10403
May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-105, § 29(a), 47 DCR 1325
Nov. 22, 2000, 114 Stat. 2440, Pub. L. 106-552, § 164(a)
June 19, 2001, D.C. Law 13-313, § 4(b), 48 DCR 1873
July 30, 2003, D.C. Law 15-26, § 2, 50 DCR 4651
Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-212, § 2(a), 51 DCR 8820
Oct. 16, 2006, 120 Stat. 2043, Pub. L. 109-356, § 308(b)
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-267, § 2, 54 DCR 831

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-204.48 and § 47-391.01.